Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1170.04
Request for payment; form of vouchers.

The Director of Administrative Services shall prepare blank forms of vouchers for use in all the state's departments and for the use of all manner of requesters to the state who receive their pay by warrants drawn by the director upon the State Treasurer, excepting requests examined, approved, and certified to the director by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, as provided by law. The vouchers shall be issued in original, duplicate, or triplicate forms as the necessities of the special institution may require.

Laws 1895, c. 65, § 1, p. 234;

Laws 1897, c. 73, § 1, p. 332;

R.S.1913, § 6686;

C.S.1922, § 6223;

C.S.1929, § 77-2612;

R.S.1943, § 77-2412;

Laws 1984, LB 933, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-2412;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 17.

Statute providing for refund of excessive grain inspection fees is valid where it requires statutory procedure for presentation, examination and payment of claims to be followed. Bollen v. Price, 129 Neb. 342, 261 N.W. 689 (1935).

Section applies to claim for fixed salary of clerk. State ex rel. Simons v. Cornell, 51 Neb. 553, 71 N.W. 300 (1897).

Section applies to claims against state university. State ex rel. Board of Regents v. Moore, 46 Neb. 373, 64 N.W. 975 (1895).